Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1044
Next-generation 911, defined.

Next-generation 911 means an Internet protocol-based system that:

(1) Ensures interoperability;

(2) Is secure;

(3) Employs commonly accepted standards;

(4) Enables emergency communications centers to receive, process, and analyze all types of 911 requests for emergency services;

(5) Acquires and integrates additional information useful to handling 911 requests for emergency services; and

(6) Supports sharing information related to 911 requests for emergency services among public safety answering points and emergency service providers.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1015;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 26.